Washington statutes.
RCW 18.16.010

Intent.

The legislature recognizes that the practices of cosmetology, hair design, barbering, manicuring, and esthetics involve the use of tools and chemicals which may be dangerous when mixed or applied improperly, and therefore finds it necessary in the interest of the public health, safety, and welfare to regulate those practices in this state.

[ 2015 c 62 s 13; 2002 c 111 s 1; 1984 c 208 s 1.]

NOTES:

Effective date—2002 c 111: "This act takes effect June 1, 2003." [ 2002 c 111 s 18.]